Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2447.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 44 of the General Laws entitled "TAXATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 33.7
TAX CREDIT FOR FOOD DONATION
44-33.7-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Apparently wholesome food" means food that is fit for human consumption at the time
it was donated as long as it meets all safety and safety-related standards required by federal, state,
and local laws regardless of compliance with any laws, rules or ordinances regulating the packaging
or labeling of food which are not linked to food safety. "Apparently wholesome food" as stipulated
in the Bill Emerson Good Samaritan Food Donation Act (42 U.S.C. § 1791) is defined as "food
that meets all quality and labeling standards imposed by federal, state, and local laws and
regulations, even though the food may not be readily marketable due to appearance, age, freshness,
grade, size, surplus, or other conditions." "Apparently wholesome food" does not include canned
goods that are leaking, swollen, dented on a seam, or no longer airtight.
(2) "Donate" means to give without requiring anything of monetary value from the
recipient, except that the term shall include giving food, notwithstanding that the donor receives or
charges a Good Samaritan reduced price.
(3) "Division" means the division of taxation.

(4) "Good Samaritan reduced price" means a price that is an amount not greater than the
cost of handling, administering, harvesting, processing, packaging, transporting, and distributing
the apparently wholesome food.
(5) "Nonprofit organization" means a nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal
taxation pursuant to § 501(c)(3) of the Federal Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) that:
(i) Operates for religious, charitable, or educational purposes;
(ii) Does not provide net earnings to, or operate in any other manner that inures to the
benefit of, any officer, employee, or shareholder of the entity; and
(6) "Qualified taxpayer" means a corporation, partnership, organization, or association,
including a food producer, retail grocer, wholesaler, hotel, motel, manufacturer, restaurant, caterer,
farmer, nonprofit food distributor, or hospital.
44-33.7-2. Credit for food donation.
(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, any qualified taxpayer that
donates apparently wholesome food to a nonprofit organization shall be allowed a credit to be
computed as provided in this chapter against a tax imposed by chapters 11, 14, 17, and 30 of this
title, for the taxable year of the donation. The qualified taxpayer shall be allowed a credit in an
amount equal to seventy-five percent (75%) of the fair market value of such apparently wholesome
food. This credit shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per tax year.
(b) Credits shall be allowed under this section only if:
(1) The use of the donated food by the donee nonprofit organization is related to providing
food to the needy; and
(2) The donated food, if sold by the donee nonprofit organization, is provided to or sold to
the needy or other nonprofit organizations that intend to use the food to provide food to the needy
at no cost or at a Good Samaritan reduced price.
(c) Upon receipt of the donated food, the nonprofit organization shall provide a certificate
to the qualified taxpayer, which shall contain the name of the qualified taxpayer, the name and
address of the donee nonprofit organization, the date of the donation, the type and quantity of
donated food, and, as provided by the qualified taxpayer, the fair market value of the donated food.
The certificate shall also include a statement by the donee nonprofit organization that its use and
disposition of the donated food complies with the requirements under subsection (b) of this section.
The certificate shall also include a statement by the donee nonprofit organization that the donation
meets the definition of apparently wholesome food.
(d) For every taxable year for which a qualified taxpayer seeks a tax credit under this
chapter, the person shall apply to the division in accordance with the forms, instructions, dates, and
LC004427 - Page 2 of 4

procedures prescribed by the division.
44-33.7-3. Limit on tax credit.
(a) The amount of the credit claimed under § 44-33.7-2(a) shall not exceed the total amount
of tax imposed upon the qualified taxpayer for the taxable year. Any credit not usable for the taxable
year for which the credit was first allowed may be carried over for credit against the income taxes
of the qualified taxpayer in the next five (5) succeeding taxable years or until the total amount of
the tax credit has been taken, whichever is sooner.
(b) Credits granted to a partnership, limited liability company, or electing small business
corporation (S corporation) shall be allocated to the individual partners, members, or shareholders,
respectively, in proportion to their ownership or interest in such business entities.
(c) Any tax credits claimed shall not reduce a corporation's tax liability below the state
corporate minimum tax. Pursuant to chapter 14 of title 44, any tax credits claimed shall not reduce
the tax liability of a bank below the bank excise minimum tax.
44-33.7-4. Promulgation of rules and regulations.
(a) The division shall be authorized to develop guidelines, rules or regulations
implementing the provisions of this chapter. The guidelines, rules and regulations shall include
procedures for the allocation of tax credits among qualified taxpayers.
(b) The division shall not be responsible for determining whether a donation consists of
apparently wholesome food.
44-33.7-5. Reporting requirements.
Using information available to the division, the division shall report to the general
assembly, annually, through the division of taxation’s testimony at a revenue estimating
conference, regarding the use of the credit authorized under this chapter. The report shall include,
at a minimum, the credits generated in the taxable year, the credits claimed in the taxable year, and
the number of qualified taxpayer claimed credits.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC004427
========
LC004427 - Page 3 of 4